dictionaries/be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 аная .
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 0 анаў .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 авалася .
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 0 аўскіх .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 аўскія .
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 0 ьна .
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 0 хаем .
SFX 3982 Y 1
SFX 3982 0 ыстае .
SFX 3981 Y 1
SFX 3981 0 ыстай .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 ыстак .
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 0 ыстам .
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 чыцца .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 0 заванае .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 0 заванай .
SFX 2683 Y 1
SFX 2683 0 шаных .
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 0 шаныя .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 стым .
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 0 знаўцам .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 альнік .
SFX 2459 Y 1
SFX 2459 0 ою .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 оў .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 аўскі .
SFX 4966 Y 1
SFX 4966 0 наюцца .
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 0 овае .
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 0 овай .
SFX 2264 Y 1
SFX 2264 0 овак .
SFX 4389 Y 1
SFX 4389 0 овам .
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 0 туеш .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 кіх .
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 0 кія .
SFX 485 Y 1
SFX 485 0 леную .
SFX 876 Y 1
SFX 876 0 стаму .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 стамі .
SFX 2427 Y 1
SFX 2427 0 авік .
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 0 ізаваным .
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 0 швала .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 олагамі .
SFX 2485 Y 1
SFX 2485 0 жных .
SFX 2484 Y 1
SFX 2484 0 жныя .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 джанаму .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 0 ніцкую .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 ажны .
SFX 2936 Y 1
SFX 2936 0 йным .
SFX 3525 Y 1
SFX 3525 0 ьваецеся .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 зуйце .
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 0 ляешся .
SFX 4970 Y 1
SFX 4970 0 налася .
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 0 аўцам .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 ачных .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 0 ачныя .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 шыся .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 ковым .
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 0 снаю .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 сная .
SFX 3559 Y 1
SFX 3559 0 квала .
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 0 гах .
SFX 2492 Y 1
SFX 2492 0 гаю .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 гаў .
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 0 оідзе .
SFX 1960 Y 1
SFX 1960 0 арнымі .
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 0 жваюцца .
SFX 4373 Y 1
SFX 4373 0 оўшчыцу .
SFX 4372 Y 1
SFX 4372 0 оўшчыцы .
SFX 3909 Y 1
SFX 3909 0 ізавалася .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 ьнасць .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 ьнасцю .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 ьнасці .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 метр .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 0 ўца .
SFX 4843 Y 1
SFX 4843 0 даем .
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 0 ьваю .
SFX 1906 Y 1
SFX 1906 0 ьваў .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 ламу .
SFX 1624 Y 1
SFX 1624 0 ламі .
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 0 атым .
SFX 1244 Y 1
SFX 1244 0 зіла .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 джаную .
SFX 4871 Y 1
SFX 4871 0 ача .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 аем .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 чных .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 чныя .
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 0 ілі .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 іках .
SFX 4089 Y 1
SFX 4089 0 ікаю .
SFX 2572 Y 1
SFX 2572 0 ікаў .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 шчыка .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 нікавага .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 оўках .
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 0 оўкаю .
SFX 4048 Y 1
SFX 4048 0 раючыся .
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 0 ерах .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 ераў .
SFX 1160 Y 1
SFX 1160 0 ўскую .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 дзіліся .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 еце .
SFX 4279 Y 1
SFX 4279 0 еда .
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 0 ствавала .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 ажных .
SFX 4673 Y 1
SFX 4673 0 ажныя .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 ніцу .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 ніцы .
SFX 3549 Y 1
SFX 3549 0 ніць .
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 0 дзіўся .
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 0 вальшчыка .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 падобным .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 0 нтах .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 нтаў .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 чнымі .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 айся .
SFX 3224 Y 1
SFX 3224 0 каўся .
SFX 3117 Y 1
SFX 3117 0 каліся .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 авымі .
SFX 3803 Y 1
SFX 3803 0 арскую .
SFX 1372 Y 1
SFX 1372 0 ча .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 ліваліся .
SFX 4297 Y 1
SFX 4297 0 вальнік .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 шанае .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 шанай .
SFX 4863 Y 1
SFX 4863 0 водчаму .
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 0 ед .
SFX 3571 Y 1
SFX 3571 0 ей .
SFX 3230 Y 1
SFX 3230 0 ек .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 ем .
SFX 1896 Y 1
SFX 1896 0 зацыяй .
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 0 оід .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 стага .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 кла .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 леных .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 леныя .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 цыйны .
SFX 4817 Y 1
SFX 4817 0 жайце .
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 0 аламі .
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 0 стую .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 ўнымі .
SFX 4880 Y 1
SFX 4880 0 аводам .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 сцкі .
SFX 1962 Y 1
SFX 1962 0 арны .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 джанага .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 йнымі .
SFX 1941 Y 1
SFX 1941 0 цкае .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 цкай .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 жнае .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 жнай .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 чвайце .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 ізаваную .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 жнаму .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 чванне .
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 0 джваю .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 джваў .
SFX 4445 Y 1
SFX 4445 0 етрычнаму .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 вымі .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 нецца .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 йную .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 ачнае .
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 0 ачнай .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 завала .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 0 лым .
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 0 льскім .
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 0 раваным .
SFX 3913 Y 1
SFX 3913 0 зае .
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 0 зай .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 зам .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 лкамі .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 нулася .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 0 нічаеце .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 лага .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 ковую .
SFX 3574 Y 1
SFX 3574 0 джаных .
SFX 3573 Y 1
SFX 3573 0 джаныя .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 антах .
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 0 антаў .
SFX 4083 Y 1
SFX 4083 0 іруюцца .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 рыла .
SFX 3052 Y 1
SFX 3052 0 жвалася .
SFX 3180 Y 1
SFX 3180 0 раючы .
SFX 3212 Y 1
SFX 3212 0 лагічным .
SFX 3151 Y 1
SFX 3151 0 атую .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 чнае .
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 0 чнай .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 ана .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 0 ане .
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 0 ападобным .
SFX 3325 Y 1
SFX 3325 0 нскі .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 тарах .
SFX 3409 Y 1
SFX 3409 0 тараў .
SFX 3926 Y 1
SFX 3926 0 джвала .
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 0 вальшчыцай .
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 0 вальшчыцам .
SFX 1015 Y 1
SFX 1015 0 ляем .
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 0 льніка .
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 0 джу .
SFX 2463 Y 1
SFX 2463 0 ованымі .
SFX 4319 Y 1
SFX 4319 0 шваючы .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 ўцах .
SFX 2391 Y 1
SFX 2391 0 ўцаў .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 зуем .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 ажнае .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 ажнай .
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 0 біш .
SFX 3725 Y 1
SFX 3725 0 біў .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 ваючы .
SFX 3500 Y 1
SFX 3500 0 атэрапію .
SFX 3499 Y 1
SFX 3499 0 атэрапія .
SFX 3501 Y 1
SFX 3501 0 атэрапіі .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 ометра .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 ною .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 ноў .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 шчыцкую .
SFX 4907 Y 1
SFX 4907 0 чоў .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 біўшы .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 уеш .
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 0 ованым .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 іцца .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 жваеце .
SFX 4724 Y 1
SFX 4724 0 ўное .
SFX 4723 Y 1
SFX 4723 0 ўной .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 каюць .
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 0 водчага .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 падобную .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 падобны .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 яе .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 яй .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 ям .
SFX 4775 Y 1
SFX 4775 0 ловы .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 ачкамі .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 на .
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 0 нг .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 не .
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 0 будаваннем .
SFX 4690 Y 1
SFX 4690 0 шцы .
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 ленае .
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 0 ленай .
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 0 ьны .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 хаеш .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 сіце .
SFX 1639 Y 1
SFX 1639 0 ыстах .
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 0 ыстаю .
SFX 3978 Y 1
SFX 3978 0 ыстая .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 ыстаў .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 0 заванаю .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 0 заваная .
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 0 стых .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 знаўцах .
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 0 стыя .
SFX 4810 Y 1
SFX 4810 0 знаўцаў .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 кніце .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 оваю .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 овая .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 0 жнага .
SFX 4475 Y 1
SFX 4475 0 аўкамі .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 авіч .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 ніцкае .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 ніцкай .
SFX 3704 Y 1
SFX 3704 0 ізаваных .
SFX 3703 Y 1
SFX 3703 0 ізаваныя .
SFX 4354 Y 1
SFX 4354 0 таваным .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 ыўны .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 етрычнага .
SFX 3643 Y 1
SFX 3643 0 уйцеся .
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 0 швалі .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 ста .
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 0 туеце .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 0 йных .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 0 йныя .
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 0 сак .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 сам .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 ьнымі .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 0 алагічным .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 ызацыю .
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 0 ызацыя .
SFX 2681 Y 1
SFX 2681 0 ызацыі .
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 0 ючыся .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 аўцах .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 аўцаў .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 лую .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 ковых .
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 0 ковыя .
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 0 уцца .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 раваную .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 люся .
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 0 аваўшыся .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 зіцеся .
SFX 3558 Y 1
SFX 3558 0 квалі .
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 0 джанае .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 джанай .
SFX 4023 Y 1
SFX 4023 0 целем .
SFX 3406 Y 1
SFX 3406 0 ўцу .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 ўцы .
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 0 даеш .
SFX 3912 Y 1
SFX 3912 0 заем .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 іка .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 атых .
SFX 3147 Y 1
SFX 3147 0 атыя .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 0 зілі .
SFX 4899 Y 1
SFX 4899 0 ызавана .
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 0 аўшы .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 ліваюся .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 ачу .
SFX 838 Y 1
SFX 838 0 ачы .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 лагічную .
SFX 4250 Y 1
SFX 4250 0 нгам .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 аеш .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 ападобную .
SFX 2749 Y 1
SFX 2749 0 альніка .
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 0 льным .
SFX 1185 Y 1
SFX 1185 0 ўскае .
SFX 1184 Y 1
SFX 1184 0 ўскай .
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 0 шчыку .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 шчыкі .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 0 нцам .
SFX 4533 Y 1
SFX 4533 0 цілася .
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 0 нее .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 ней .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 нем .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 ьскую .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 ець .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 анасць .
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 0 анасцю .
SFX 2279 Y 1
SFX 2279 0 анасці .
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 0 йны .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 еду .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 еды .
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 0 ствавалі .
SFX 3907 Y 1
SFX 3907 0 ізаваўся .
SFX 4136 Y 1
SFX 4136 0 вальшчыку .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 вальшчыкі .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 метра .
SFX 3813 Y 1
SFX 3813 0 арскае .
SFX 3812 Y 1
SFX 3812 0 арскай .
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 0 куем .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 падобных .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 падобныя .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 ованую .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 рка .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 0 ьце .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 ваным .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 оўваем .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 0 іруючы .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 вым .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 чу .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 чы .
SFX 3323 Y 1
SFX 3323 0 нтамі .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 шанаю .
SFX 2688 Y 1
SFX 2688 0 шаная .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 стае .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 стай .
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 0 стак .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 стам .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 шана .
SFX 1450 Y 1
SFX 1450 0 ер .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 ет .
SFX 1823 Y 1
SFX 1823 0 ец .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 еш .
SFX 4638 Y 1
SFX 4638 0 ею .
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 0 еў .
SFX 1895 Y 1
SFX 1895 0 зацыяю .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 няты .
SFX 3589 Y 1
SFX 3589 0 графічны .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 клі .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 0 шчыцкімі .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 ізаванае .
SFX 3712 Y 1
SFX 3712 0 ізаванай .
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 0 оўшчык .
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 0 аводах .
SFX 4878 Y 1
SFX 4878 0 аводаў .
SFX 1939 Y 1
SFX 1939 0 цкаю .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 цкая .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 жнаю .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 жная .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 йнае .
SFX 3121 Y 1
SFX 3121 0 йнай .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 вяць .
SFX 3629 Y 1
SFX 3629 0 чванню .
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 0 чвання .
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 0 чванні .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 таваную .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 ўшчыка .
SFX 3657 Y 1
SFX 3657 0 паюць .
SFX 4309 Y 1
SFX 4309 0 яемся .
SFX 4134 Y 1
SFX 4134 0 гаеце .
